test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kelj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - кель: # Ordinary nouns 'tongue' - full paradigm including MWN
     кель+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: кель
     кель+N+SP+Gen+Indef: келень
     кель+N+SP+Abl+Indef: кельда
     кель+N+SP+Dat+Indef: келенди
     кель+N+SP+Abe+Indef: кельфтома
     кель+N+SP+Comp+Indef: кельшка
     кель+N+SP+Ine+Indef: кельса
     кель+N+SP+Ela+Indef: кельста
     кель+N+SP+Ill+Indef: кельс
     кель+N+SP+Prl+Indef: кельгя
     кель+N+SP+Tra+Indef: келькс
     кель+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: келезе
     кель+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: келене
     кель+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: келезень
     кель+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: кельнень
     кель+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [келезти, келезенди]
     кель+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: кельненди
     кель+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1: кельдон
     кель+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1: кельфтомон
     кель+N+SP+Comp+PxSg1: кельшкан
     кель+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1: кельсон
     кель+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1: кельстон
     кель+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1: келезон
     кель+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1: кельгян
     кель+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: кельце
     кель+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: кельхне
     кель+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: кельцень
     кель+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: кельхнень
     кель+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2: кельдот
     кель+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2: кельфтомот
     кель+N+SP+Comp+PxSg2: кельшкат
     кель+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2: кельсот
     кель+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2: кельстот
     кель+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2: келезот
     кель+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2: кельгят
     кель+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: кельц
     кель+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: келенза
     кель+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: келенц
     кель+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: келензон
     кель+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: келенцты
     кель+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: келензонды
     кель+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3: кельдонза
     кель+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3: кельфтомонза
     кель+N+SP+Comp+PxSg3: кельшканза
     кель+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3: кельсонза
     кель+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3: кельстонза
     кель+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3: кельзонза
     кель+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3: кельгянза
     кель+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1: келеньке
     кель+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1: келеньконь
     кель+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1: келеньконди
     кель+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1: кельдонк
     кель+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1: кельфтомонк
     кель+N+SP+Comp+PxPl1: кельшканк
     кель+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1: кельсонк
     кель+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1: кельстонк
     кель+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1: кельзонк
     кель+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1: кельгянк
     кель+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2: келенте
     кель+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2: келентень
     кель+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2: келентенди
     кель+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2: кельдонт
     кель+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2: кельфтомонт
     кель+N+SP+Comp+PxPl2: кельшкант
     кель+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2: кельсонт
     кель+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2: кельстонт
     кель+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2: келезонт
     кель+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2: кельгянт
     кель+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3: кельсна
     кель+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3: кельснон
     кель+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3: кельснонды
     кель+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3: кельдост
     кель+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3: кельфтомост
     кель+N+SP+Comp+PxPl3: кельшкаст
     кель+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3: кельсост
     кель+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3: кельстост
     кель+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3: келезост
     кель+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3: кельгяст
     кель+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: кельхт
     кель+N+Sg+Nom+Def: кельсь
     кель+N+Sg+Gen+Def: кельть
     кель+N+Sg+Dat+Def: [кельти, келенди]
     кель+N+Pl+Nom+Def: кельхне
     кель+N+Pl+Gen+Def: кельхнень
     кель+N+Pl+Dat+Def: кельхненди
     кель+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок: келевок
     кель+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Foc/вок: келеньвок
     #кель+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Foc/гЕ: келеньге 
     #сон+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom+Foc/гЕ: сонга 
     кель+N+SP+Abl+Indef+Foc/вок: кельдовок
     кель+N+SP+Dat+Indef+Foc/вок: келеньдивок
     кель+N+SP+Abe+Indef+Foc/вок: кельфтомовок
     кель+N+SP+Comp+Indef+Foc/вок: кельшкавок
     кель+N+SP+Ine+Indef+Foc/вок: кельсовок
     кель+N+SP+Ela+Indef+Foc/вок: кельстовок
     кель+N+SP+Ill+Indef+Foc/вок: кельска
     кель+N+SP+Prl+Indef+Foc/вок: кельгявок
     кель+N+SP+Tra+Indef+Foc/вок: келькска
     кель+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/вок: келезевок
     кель+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/вок: келеневок
     кель+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/вок: келезеньге
     кель+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/вок: келененьге
     кель+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1+Foc/вок: [келезтивок, келезендивок]
     кель+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+Foc/вок: келенендивок
     кель+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1+Foc/вок: кельдонга
     кель+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1+Foc/вок: кельфтомонга
     кель+N+SP+Comp+PxSg1+Foc/вок: кельшканка
     кель+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1+Foc/вок: кельсонга
     кель+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1+Foc/вок: кельстонга
     кель+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1+Foc/вок: келезонга
     кель+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1+Foc/вок: кельгянга
     кель+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/вок: кельцевок
     кель+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/вок: кельхневок
     кель+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/вок: кельценьге
     кель+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/вок: кельхненьге
     кель+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2+Foc/вок: кельдотка
     кель+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2+Foc/вок: кельфтомотка
     кель+N+SP+Comp+PxSg2+Foc/вок: кельшкатка
     кель+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2+Foc/вок: кельсотка
     кель+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2+Foc/вок: кельстотка
     кель+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2+Foc/вок: келезотка
     кель+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2+Foc/вок: кельгятка
     кель+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/вок: кельцевок
     кель+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/вок: келензовок
     кель+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/вок: келенцка
     кель+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/вок: келензонга
     кель+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3+Foc/вок: келенцтывок
     кель+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3+Foc/вок: келензондывок
     кель+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3+Foc/вок: кельдонзовок
     кель+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3+Foc/вок: кельфтомонзовок
     кель+N+SP+Comp+PxSg3+Foc/вок: кельшканзовок
     кель+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3+Foc/вок: кельсонзовок
     кель+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3+Foc/вок: кельстонзовок
     кель+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3+Foc/вок: кельзонзовок
     кель+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3+Foc/вок: кельгянзовок
     кель+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1+Foc/вок: келенькевок
     кель+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1+Foc/вок: келеньконьге
     кель+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1+Foc/вок: келенькондивок
     кель+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1+Foc/вок: кельдонковок
     кель+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1+Foc/вок: кельфтомонковок
     кель+N+SP+Comp+PxPl1+Foc/вок: кельшканковок
     кель+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1+Foc/вок: кельсонковок
     кель+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1+Foc/вок: кельстонковок
     кель+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1+Foc/вок: кельзонковок
     кель+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1+Foc/вок: кельгянковок
     кель+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2+Foc/вок: келентевок
     кель+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2+Foc/вок: келентеньге
     кель+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2+Foc/вок: келентендивок
     кель+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2+Foc/вок: кельдонтка
     кель+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2+Foc/вок: кельфтомонтовок
     кель+N+SP+Comp+PxPl2+Foc/вок: кельшкантовок
     кель+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2+Foc/вок: кельсонтка
     кель+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2+Foc/вок: кельстонтка
     кель+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2+Foc/вок: келезонтка
     кель+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2+Foc/вок: кельгянтка
     кель+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3+Foc/вок: кельсновок
     кель+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3+Foc/вок: кельснонга
     кель+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3+Foc/вок: кельснондывок
     кель+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3+Foc/вок: кельдостка
     кель+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3+Foc/вок: кельфтомостка
     кель+N+SP+Comp+PxPl3+Foc/вок: кельшкастка
     кель+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3+Foc/вок: кельсостка
     кель+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3+Foc/вок: кельстостка
     кель+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3+Foc/вок: келезостка
     кель+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3+Foc/вок: кельгястка
     кель+N+Pl+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок: кельхтка
     кель+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Foc/вок: кельське
     кель+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Foc/вок: кельтьке
     кель+N+Sg+Dat+Def+Foc/вок: [кельтивок, келеньдивок]
     кель+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Foc/вок: кельхневок
     кель+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Foc/вок: кельхненьге
     кель+N+Pl+Dat+Def+Foc/вок: кельхнендивок
